Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-860
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 79-859 to 79-871:

(1) Commission means the Professional Practices Commission;

(2) Board means the State Board of Education; and

(3) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Education.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1280.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 485.